src/morphology/stems/adj.lexc
!!  !!!Adjective classification
!!  Adjectives are words that are inflected like nouns, with few additions. For
!!  adjectives, the comparative derivations are usually allowed and the
!!  possessive suffixes are unlikely. The syntactic adjectives that do not have
!!  comparative derivations are nouns, if they have nominal inflection, or
!!  particles, if they do not inflect. The examples you need to find the 
!!  correct classification are same as for nouns, with addition of comparative
!!  and superlative.

LEXICON ADJ_TUMMAHKO
!!  The words in this class ending in o belong to {{@LEXNAME@}}, the old
!!  dictionaries use class ¹. The stems should be entered in dictionary like:
!!  {{{tummahko+A:tummahko A_TUMMAHKO  ;}}}
!!  This class includes back vowel moderative
!!  derivations. N.B. the comparative derivation of moderatives is semantically
!!  awkward, but morphologically plausible.
!!€gt-norm:  Adjectives 1 o
!!€  tummahko: tummahko+A+Sg+Nom # darkish
!!€  tummahkona: tummahko+A+Sg+Ess
!!€  tummahkossa: tummahko+A+Sg+Ine
!!€  tummahkoina: tummahko+A+Pl+Ess
!!€  tummahkoissa: tummahko+A+Pl+Ine
!!€  tummahkoa: tummahko+A+Sg+Par
!!$  tummahkota: tummahko+A+Sg+Par
!!€  tummahkoon: tummahko+A+Sg+Ill
!!$  tummahkohon: tummahko+A+Sg+Ill
!!$  tummahkoseen: tummahko+A+Sg+Ill
!!€  tummahkoja: tummahko+A+Pl+Par
!!$  tummahkoita: tummahko+A+Pl+Par
!!€  tummahkojen: tummahko+A+Pl+Gen
!!$  tummahkoiden: tummahko+A+Pl+Gen
!!$  tummahkoitten: tummahko+A+Pl+Gen
!!€  tummahkoihin: tummahko+A+Pl+Ill
!!$  tummahkoisiin: tummahko+A+Pl+Ill
!!€  tummahkompi: tummahko+A+Comp+Sg+Nom
!!€  tummahkoin: tummahko+A+Sup+Sg+Nom
0  ADJ_BACK_NOMINATIVE  ;
0  ADJ_BACK_SINGULARS  ;
0  ADJ_BACK_PLURALS  ;
0  ADJ_BACK_PARTITIVE_A_AN  ;
0  ADJ_BACK_ILLATIVE_ON  ;
0  ADJ_BACK_PARTITIVE_JA  ;
0  ADJ_BACK_GENITIVE_JEN  ;
0  ADJ_BACK_ILLATIVE_IHIN  ;
0  ADJ_BACK_COMPARATIVE  ;
0  ADJ_BACK_SUPERLATIVE  ;

LEXICON ADJ_VALKAISTU
!!  The stems ending in u are in class {{@LEXNAME@}}, and in old dictionaries
!!  the class is ¹. These stems should be entered in dictionary like:
!!  {{{valkaistu+A:valkaistu A_VALKAISTU  ;}}}
!!  Common part of this class is formed by nut participle 
!!  passive’s _back_ vowel versions after s stem verbs:
!!€gt-norm:  Adjectives 1 u
!!€  valkaistu: valkaistu+A+Sg+Nom # bleached
!!€  valkaistua: valkaistu+A+Sg+Par
!!€  valkaistuun: valkaistu+A+Sg+Ill
!!€  valkaistuna: valkaistu+A+Sg+Ess
!!€  valkaistussa: valkaistu+A+Sg+Ine
!!€  valkaistuja: valkaistu+A+Pl+Par
!!€  valkaistujen: valkaistu+A+Pl+Gen
!!€  valkaistuihin: valkaistu+A+Pl+Ill
!!€  valkaistuina: valkaistu+A+Pl+Ess
!!€  valkaistuissa: valkaistu+A+Pl+Ine
!!€  valkaistumpi: valkaistu+A+Comp+Sg+Nom
!!€  valkaistuin: valkaistu+A+Sup+Sg+Nom
0  ADJ_BACK_NOMINATIVE  ;
0  ADJ_BACK_SINGULARS  ;
0  ADJ_BACK_PLURALS  ;
0  ADJ_BACK_PARTITIVE_A_AN  ;
0  ADJ_BACK_ILLATIVE_UN  ;
0  ADJ_BACK_PARTITIVE_JA  ;
0  ADJ_BACK_GENITIVE_JEN  ;
0  ADJ_BACK_ILLATIVE_IHIN  ;
0  ADJ_BACK_COMPARATIVE  ;
0  ADJ_BACK_SUPERLATIVE  ;

LEXICON ADJ_HÄPÄISTY
!!  The stems ending in y are in class {{@LEXNAME@}}, and in old dictionaries
!!  the class is ¹. Common part of this class is formed by nut participle 
!!  passive’s _front_ vowel versions after s stem verbs:
!!€gt-norm:  Adjectives 1 y
!!€  häpäisty: häpäisty+A+Sg+Nom # defiled
!!€  häpäistyä: häpäisty+A+Sg+Par
!!€  häpäistyyn: häpäisty+A+Sg+Ill
!!€  häpäistynä: häpäisty+A+Sg+Ess
!!€  häpäistyssä: häpäisty+A+Sg+Ine
!!€  häpäistyjä: häpäisty+A+Pl+Par
!!€  häpäistyjen: häpäisty+A+Pl+Gen
!!€  häpäistyihin: häpäisty+A+Pl+Ill
!!€  häpäistyinä: häpäisty+A+Pl+Ess
!!€  häpäistyissä: häpäisty+A+Pl+Ine
!!€  häpäistympi: häpäisty+A+Comp+Sg+Nom
!!€  häpäistyin: häpäisty+A+Sup+Sg+Nom
0  ADJ_FRONT_NOMINATIVE  ;
0  ADJ_FRONT_SINGULARS  ;
0  ADJ_FRONT_PLURALS  ;
0  ADJ_FRONT_PARTITIVE_Ä_ÄN  ;
0  ADJ_FRONT_ILLATIVE_YN  ;
0  ADJ_FRONT_PARTITIVE_JÄ  ;
0  ADJ_FRONT_GENITIVE_JEN  ;
0  ADJ_FRONT_ILLATIVE_IHIN  ;
0  ADJ_FRONT_COMPARATIVE  ;
0  ADJ_FRONT_SUPERLATIVE  ;

LEXICON ADJ_HÖLÖ
!!  The words in this class ending in ö belong to {{@LEXNAME@}}, the old
!!  dictionaries use class ¹. This class includes front vowel moderative
!!  derivations.
!!€gt-norm:  Adjectives 1 ö
!!€  hölö: hölö+A+Sg+Nom # blabbermouth
!!€  hölöä: hölö+A+Sg+Par
!!€  hölöön: hölö+A+Sg+Ill
!!€  hölönä: hölö+A+Sg+Ess
!!€  hölössä: hölö+A+Sg+Ine
!!€  hölöjä: hölö+A+Pl+Par
!!€  hölöjen: hölö+A+Pl+Gen
!!€  hölöihin: hölö+A+Pl+Ill
!!€  hölöinä: hölö+A+Pl+Ess
!!€  hölöissä: hölö+A+Pl+Ine
!!€  hölömpi: hölö+A+Comp+Sg+Nom
!!€  hölöin: hölö+A+Sup+Sg+Nom
0  ADJ_FRONT_NOMINATIVE  ;
0  ADJ_FRONT_SINGULARS  ;
0  ADJ_FRONT_PLURALS  ;
0  ADJ_FRONT_PARTITIVE_Ä_ÄN  ;
0  ADJ_FRONT_ILLATIVE_ÖN  ;
0  ADJ_FRONT_PARTITIVE_JÄ  ;
0  ADJ_FRONT_GENITIVE_JEN  ;
0  ADJ_FRONT_ILLATIVE_IHIN  ;
0  ADJ_FRONT_COMPARATIVE  ;
0  ADJ_FRONT_SUPERLATIVE  ;

LEXICON ADJ_TOOPE
!!  The new words with e stem have same allomorph selection as old short
!!  unchanging bisyllabic u, y, o and ö stems, and no stem-internal variation.
!!  The classification for the back vowel variant of this class is
!!  {{@LEXNAME@}}, and old dictionaries used the class ⁸.
!!€gt-norm:  Adjectives 8 back
!!€  toope: toope+A+Sg+Nom # doofus
!!€  toopea: toope+A+Sg+Par
!!€  toopeen: toope+A+Sg+Ill
!!€  toopeja: toope+A+Pl+Par
!!€  toopejen: toope+A+Pl+Gen
!!€  toopeihin: toope+A+Pl+Ill
!!€  toopempi: toope+A+Comp+Sg+Nom
!!€  toopein: toope+A+Sup+Sg+Nom
!!  They also have slightly greater probability for archaic form of plural
!!  genitive:
!!€  toopein: toope+A+Pl+Gen+Use/Rare
0  ADJ_BACK_NOMINATIVE  ;
0  ADJ_BACK_SINGULARS  ;
0  ADJ_BACK_PLURALS  ;
0  ADJ_BACK_PARTITIVE_A_AN  ;
0  ADJ_BACK_ILLATIVE_EN  ;
0  ADJ_BACK_PARTITIVE_JA  ;
0  ADJ_BACK_GENITIVE_JEN  ;
0  ADJ_BACK_GENITIVE_IN  ;
0  ADJ_BACK_ILLATIVE_IHIN  ;
0  ADJ_BACK_COMPARATIVE  ;
0  ADJ_BACK_SUPERLATIVE  ;


LEXICON ADJ_BEIGE
!!  The front variation of unchanging e stems is class {{@LEXNAME}}, and in
!!  old dictionaries ⁸.
!!€gt-norm:  Adjectives 8 front
!!€  beige: beige+A+Sg+Nom # beige
!!€  beigeä: beige+A+Sg+Par
!!€  beigeen: beige+A+Sg+Ill
!!€  beigejä: beige+A+Pl+Par
!!€  beigejen: beige+A+Pl+Gen
!!€  beigeihin: beige+A+Pl+Ill
!!€  beigempi: beige+A+Comp+Sg+Nom
!!€  beigein: beige+A+Sup+Sg+Nom
0  ADJ_FRONT_NOMINATIVE  ;
0  ADJ_FRONT_SINGULARS  ;
0  ADJ_FRONT_PLURALS  ;
0  ADJ_FRONT_PARTITIVE_Ä_ÄN  ;
0  ADJ_FRONT_ILLATIVE_EN  ;
0  ADJ_FRONT_PARTITIVE_JÄ  ;
0  ADJ_FRONT_GENITIVE_JEN  ;
0  ADJ_FRONT_GENITIVE_IN  ;
0  ADJ_FRONT_ILLATIVE_IHIN  ;
0  ADJ_FRONT_COMPARATIVE  ;
0  ADJ_FRONT_SUPERLATIVE  ;


!!  !Trisyllabic and longer non-derived adjectuve stems
!!  The trisyllabic and longer words with stem vowels o, u, y and ö also
!!  have no stem variation either, but selection of suffix allomorphs for 
!!  plural genitives and partitives is wider than for bisyllabic and derived
!!  ones.

LEXICON ADJ_KOHELO
!!  The o final trisyllabic stems are in class {{@LEXNAME@}}, and the old
!!  dictionaries used ². 
!!€gt-norm:  Adjectives 2 o
!!€  tohelo: tohelo+A+Sg+Nom # clumsy
!!€  toheloita: tohelo+A+Pl+Par
!!€  toheloja: tohelo+A+Pl+Par
!!€  tohelojen: tohelo+A+Pl+Gen
!!€  toheloiden: tohelo+A+Pl+Gen
!!€  toheloitten: tohelo+A+Pl+Gen
!!€  tohelompi: tohelo+A+Comp+Sg+Nom
!!€  toheloin: tohelo+A+Sup+Sg+Nom
0  ADJ_BACK_NOMINATIVE  ;
0  ADJ_BACK_SINGULARS  ;
0  ADJ_BACK_PLURALS  ;
0  ADJ_BACK_PARTITIVE_A_AN  ;
0  ADJ_BACK_ILLATIVE_ON  ;
0  ADJ_BACK_PARTITIVE_JA  ;
0  ADJ_BACK_PARTITIVE_ITA  ;
0  ADJ_BACK_GENITIVE_JEN  ;
0  ADJ_BACK_GENITIVE_IDEN  ;
+Use/NG:0  ADJ_BACK_GENITIVE_ITTEN  ;
0  ADJ_BACK_ILLATIVE_IHIN  ;
0  ADJ_BACK_COMPARATIVE  ;
0  ADJ_BACK_SUPERLATIVE  ;

LEXICON ADJECTIVE
aivopesty+A:aivopesty  ADJ_HÄPÄISTY  ;
albiino+A:albiino  ADJ_KOHELO  ;
beige+A:beige  ADJ_BEIGE  ;
epähieno+A:epä#hieno  ADJ_TUMMAHKO  ;
epäjalo+A:epäjalo  ADJ_TUMMAHKO  ;
fiksu+A:fiksu  ADJ_VALKAISTU  ;
halju+A:halju  ADJ_VALKAISTU  ;
hapahko+A:hapahko  ADJ_KOHELO  ;
hapero+A:hapero  ADJ_KOHELO  ;
harsu+A:harsu  ADJ_VALKAISTU  ;
helo+A:helo  ADJ_TUMMAHKO  ;
helpohko+A:helpohko  ADJ_KOHELO  ;
hipaistu+A:hipaistu  ADJ_VALKAISTU  ;
hiuksenhieno+A:hiuksen#hieno  ADJ_TUMMAHKO  ;
hontelo+A:hontelo  ADJ_KOHELO  ;
huippuhieno+A:huippuhieno  ADJ_TUMMAHKO  ;
humu+A:humu  ADJ_VALKAISTU  ;
hupelo+A:hupelo  ADJ_KOHELO  ;
häijy+A:häijy  ADJ_HÄPÄISTY  ;
häilyvähkö+A:häilyvähkö  ADJ_HÖLÖ  ;
häjy+A:häjy  ADJ_HÄPÄISTY  ;
häpäisty+A:häpäisty  ADJ_HÄPÄISTY  ;
häväisty+A:häväisty  ADJ_HÄPÄISTY  ;
hölmö+A:hölmö  ADJ_HÖLÖ  ;
hölö+A:hölö  ADJ_HÖLÖ  ;
höpsö+A:höpsö  ADJ_HÖLÖ  ;
ilmaistu+A:ilmaistu  ADJ_VALKAISTU  ;
iso+A:iso  ADJ_TUMMAHKO  ;
juhlavalaistu+A:juhlavalaistu  ADJ_VALKAISTU  ;
julkaistu+A:julkaistu  ADJ_VALKAISTU  ;
jykevähkö+A:jykevähkö  ADJ_HÖLÖ  ;
jymy+A:jymy  ADJ_HÄPÄISTY  ;
jyrkähkö+A:jyrkähkö  ADJ_HÖLÖ  ;
jäykähkö+A:jäykähkö  ADJ_HÖLÖ  ;
jörö+A:jörö  ADJ_HÖLÖ  ;
kahjo+A:kahjo  ADJ_TUMMAHKO  ;
kapeahko+A:kapeahko  ADJ_TUMMAHKO  ;
karkaistu+A:karkaistu  ADJ_VALKAISTU  ;
katkaistu+A:katkaistu  ADJ_VALKAISTU  ;
kattavahko+A:kattavahko  ADJ_TUMMAHKO  ;
keltabeige+A:kelta#beige  ADJ_BEIGE  ;
keltabeige+A:keltabeige  ADJ_BEIGE  ;
kepeähkö+A:kepeähkö  ADJ_HÖLÖ  ;
kesy+A:kesy  ADJ_HÄPÄISTY  ;
kevyehkö+A:kevyehkö  ADJ_HÖLÖ  ;
kiero+A:kiero  ADJ_TUMMAHKO  ;
kiinteähkö+A:kiinteähkö  ADJ_HÖLÖ  ;
kimeähkö+A:kimeähkö  ADJ_HÖLÖ  ;
kirkaistu+A:kirkaistu  ADJ_VALKAISTU  ;
kirpeähkö+A:kirpeähkö  ADJ_HÖLÖ  ;
kohelo+A:kohelo  ADJ_KOHELO  ;
komeahko+A:komeahko  ADJ_TUMMAHKO  ;
koukero+A:koukero  ADJ_KOHELO  ;
kovahko+A:kovahko  ADJ_TUMMAHKO  ;
kuikelo+A:kuikelo  ADJ_KOHELO  ;
kuuhullu+A:kuuhullu  ADJ_VALKAISTU  ;
kuuhullu+A:kuuhullu  ADJ_VALKAISTU  ;
kuuro+A:kuuro  ADJ_TUMMAHKO  ;
kuuru+A:kuuru  ADJ_VALKAISTU  ;
kylmähkö+A:kylmähkö  ADJ_HÖLÖ  ;
kyyry+A:kyyry  ADJ_HÄPÄISTY  ;
kyömy+A:kyömy  ADJ_HÄPÄISTY  ;
kömpelöhkö+A:kömpelöhkö  ADJ_HÖLÖ  ;
köpö+A:köpö  ADJ_HÖLÖ  ;
köyhähkö+A:köyhähkö  ADJ_HÖLÖ  ;
köyry+A:köyry  ADJ_HÄPÄISTY  ;
laveahko+A:laveahko  ADJ_TUMMAHKO  ;
lesty+A:lesty  ADJ_HÄPÄISTY  ;
loppuunkäsitelty+A:loppuunkäsitelty  ADJ_HÄPÄISTY  ;
luihu+A:luihu  ADJ_VALKAISTU  ;
lyhyehkö+A:lyhyehkö  ADJ_HÖLÖ  ;
lälly+A:lälly  ADJ_HÄPÄISTY  ;
lässy+A:lässy  ADJ_HÄPÄISTY  ;
löllö+A:löllö  ADJ_HÖLÖ  ;
maalaistollo+A:maalais#tollo  ADJ_TUMMAHKO  ;
maankuulu+A:maankuulu  ADJ_VALKAISTU  ;
maankuulu+A:maankuulu  ADJ_VALKAISTU  ;
miedohko+A:miedohko  ADJ_TUMMAHKO  ;
niuho+A:niuho  ADJ_TUMMAHKO  ;
notko+A:notko  ADJ_TUMMAHKO  ;
nukkavieru+A:nukkavieru  ADJ_VALKAISTU  ;
nulju+A:nulju  ADJ_VALKAISTU  ;
nössö+A:nössö  ADJ_HÖLÖ  ;
oudohko+A:oudohko  ADJ_TUMMAHKO  ;
paksu+A:paksu  ADJ_VALKAISTU  ;
pervo+A:pervo  ADJ_TUMMAHKO  ;
pesty+A:pesty  ADJ_HÄPÄISTY  ;
pienehkö+A:pienehkö  ADJ_HÖLÖ  ;
piru+A:piru  ADJ_VALKAISTU  ;
pitkähkö+A:pitkähkö  ADJ_HÖLÖ  ;
puhkaistu+A:puhkaistu  ADJ_VALKAISTU  ;
pullo+A:pullo  ADJ_TUMMAHKO  ;
pysty+A:pysty  ADJ_HÄPÄISTY  ;
pyöreähkö+A:pyöreähkö  ADJ_HÖLÖ  ;
pähkähullu+A:pähkähullu  ADJ_VALKAISTU  ;
pölhö+A:pölhö  ADJ_HÖLÖ  ;
raju+A:raju  ADJ_VALKAISTU  ;
roisto+A:roisto  ADJ_TUMMAHKO  ;
ruipelo+A:ruipelo  ADJ_KOHELO  ;
ruskeahko+A:ruskeahko  ADJ_TUMMAHKO  ;
selkeähkö+A:selkeähkö  ADJ_HÖLÖ  ;
siivoushullu+A:siivoushullu  ADJ_VALKAISTU  ;
sopivahko+A:sopivahko  ADJ_TUMMAHKO  ;
superhieno+A:super#hieno  ADJ_TUMMAHKO  ;
suuruudenhullu+A:suuruudenhullu  ADJ_VALKAISTU  ;
syvähkö+A:syvähkö  ADJ_HÖLÖ  ;
tekaistu+A:tekaistu  ADJ_VALKAISTU  ;
tohelo+A:tohelo  ADJ_KOHELO  ;
toope+A:toope  ADJ_TOOPE  ;
tukevahko+A:tukevahko  ADJ_TUMMAHKO  ;
turhankaino+A:turhankaino  ADJ_TUMMAHKO  ;
tyhmähkö+A:tyhmähkö  ADJ_HÖLÖ  ;
tyly+A:tyly  ADJ_HÄPÄISTY  ;
töpö+A:töpö  ADJ_HÖLÖ  ;
uivelo+A:uivelo  ADJ_KOHELO  ;
ujohko+A:ujohko  ADJ_TUMMAHKO  ;
untelo+A:untelo  ADJ_KOHELO  ;
uuno+A:uuno  ADJ_TUMMAHKO  ;
valaistu+A:valaistu  ADJ_VALKAISTU  ;
vankahko+A:vankahko  ADJ_TUMMAHKO  ;
vesipesty+A:vesipesty  ADJ_HÄPÄISTY  ;
vesipesty+A:vesi#pesty  ADJ_HÄPÄISTY  ;
viileähkö+A:viileähkö  ADJ_HÖLÖ  ;
vilu+A:vilu  ADJ_VALKAISTU  ;
väsy+A:väsy  ADJ_HÄPÄISTY  ;
ylpeähkö+A:ylpeähkö  ADJ_HÖLÖ  ;
äksy+A:äksy  ADJ_HÄPÄISTY  ;
ärjy+A:ärjy  ADJ_HÄPÄISTY  ;
